Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB956.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4307. Child torture.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of child torture, if through a course of conduct, the person intentionally or knowingly commits two or more of the following acts against a child:(1) Causing bodily injury or serious bodily injury as those terms are defined in section 2301 (relating to definitions).(2) Causing mental anguish or psychological abuse in an especially depraved manner.(3) Unreasonable or extended confinement or restraint.123456789101112131415161718 (4) Unreasonable or extended activity or forced holding of positions.(5) Intentional deprivation or intentional failure to provide care, protection or support.(b) Grading.--An offense under this section constitutes a felony of the first degree.(c) Evidence and defenses.--A court shall consider all of the following:(1) Expert testimony as to the existence or extent of mental anguish or psychological abuse is not a requirement for a conviction under this section.(2) It is not a defense under this section that a child has a particular susceptibility to mental anguish or psychological abuse.(3) Evidence that a child suffered pain is not required to sustain a conviction.(4) A person's inability to financially provide care, protection or support may be considered as a defense to subsection (a)(5).(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "child" means a person under who was 18 years of age when the acts under subsection (a) were committed or began.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0956PN1085 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223